dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="जस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जे-ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जे-ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोसुकै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोसुकै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कुनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-कुनै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जुन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकैं</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कस</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अरू__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="यत्रो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-कस्ता</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-उति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जब__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="यस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="के-कस्तो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="एकअर्क__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="को__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="के__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-के</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कोही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-कोही</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="यस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दोह/ोरो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>ोरो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जस्ता__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="यस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कसै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कसै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जत्र/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="त्यस्क/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="फलन/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="क्यै"><i>क्यै</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्"><i>कल्</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्ता"><i>जस्ता</i><par n="जस्ता__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कुनै"><i>कुनै</i><par n="कुनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्रो"><i>जत्र</i><par n="जत्र/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="सुकै"><i>सुकै</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कोहि"><i>कोहि</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कोही"><i>कोही</i><par n="कोही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अरू"><i>अरू</i><par n="अरू__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कत्ति"><i>कत्ति</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="के-कस्तो"><i>के-कस्तो</i><par n="के-कस्तो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन"><i>जुन</i><par n="जुन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यती"><i>त्यती</i><par n="यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तो"><i>जस्त</i><par n="जस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तै"><i>जस्तै</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जों"><i>जों</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस्को"><i>त्यस्क</i><par n="त्यस्क/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यत्रो"><i>त्यत्रो</i><par n="यत्रो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसैं"><i>कसैं</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="क्वै"><i>क्वै</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जो"><i>जो</i><par n="जो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जहीं"><i>जहीं</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन-जुन"><i>जुन-जुन</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्ति"><i>उत्ति</i><par n="यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तस्तै"><i>तस्तै</i><par n="यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="किन"><i>किन</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="क्या"><i>क्या</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यत्रो"><i>यत्रो</i><par n="यत्रो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उता"><i>उता</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उति"><i>उति</i><par n="उति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस"><i>कस</i><par n="कस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कुन"><i>कुन</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जती"><i>जती</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जसो"><i>जसो</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यक्ति"><i>त्यक्ति</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्"><i>जस्</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसो"><i>कसो</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="एकअर्क"><i>एकअर्क</i><par n="एकअर्क__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस"><i>जस</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस"><i>यस</i><par n="यस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन्"><i>जुन्</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्को"><i>कस्को</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जब"><i>जब</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्तो"><i>कस्त</i><par n="कस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कतिपय"><i>कतिपय</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ज-जस"><i>ज-जस</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="दोहोरो"><i>दोह</i><par n="दोह/ोरो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जश्"><i>जश्</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्तो"><i>यस्त</i><par n="यस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="केहि"><i>केहि</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कति"><i>कति</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="केही"><i>केही</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जेजति"><i>जेजति</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसै"><i>कसै</i><par n="कसै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जति"><i>जति</i><par n="जति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यथा"><i>यथा</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
    <e lm="फलनो"><i>फलन</i><par n="फलन/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्"><i>यस्</i><par n="यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्ति"><i>जत्ति</i><par n="जब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस"><i>त्यस</i><par n="यस__det"/></e>
